Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.030

General duties of board.

(1) The board shall develop and administer, or approve, or both, a licensure examination in the subjects determined by the board to be essential to the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry. The board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

(2) The board, under chapter 34.05 RCW, may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including:

(a) Standards for the performance of the duties and responsibilities of veterinary technicians and veterinary medication clerks and fixing minimum standards of continuing education for veterinary technicians. The rules shall be adopted in the interest of good veterinary health care delivery to the consuming public and shall not prevent veterinary technicians from inoculating an animal; and

(b) Standards prescribing requirements for veterinary medical facilities and fixing minimum standards of continuing veterinary medical education.

(3) The department is the board's official office of record.

[ 2007 c 235 s 4; 2000 c 93 s 10; 1995 c 198 s 13; 1993 c 78 s 3; 1986 c 259 s 140; 1983 c 102 s 2; 1982 c 134 s 2; 1981 c 67 s 23; 1974 ex.s. c 44 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 3; 1961 c 157 s 2; 1959 c 92 s 4; 1941 c 71 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-4. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1941 c 71 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-9 now codified as RCW 18.92.035.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.